Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1237
Tenure; board; subpoena powers.

The board may on its own behalf, or shall upon the request of the certificated employee, his or her representative, or the educational service unit's administration, (1) subpoena and compel the attendance of witnesses residing within or outside this state for the purpose of appearing and testifying at any hearing provided for in sections 79-1234 to 79-1239 and for the purpose of taking the deposition of such witnesses in the manner prescribed by law for the taking of depositions in civil actions in the district courts and (2) issue subpoenas for the production of any papers, books, accounts, and documents.

Laws 1986, LB 997, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2219;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 954.